New York, session 2025-2026, S10412.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 17-172 2 to read as follows: 3 § 17-172. Absentee ballot drop-off fraud. Any person or entity, other 4 than the board of elections, who erects, displays or maintains an absen- 5 tee ballot drop-off box or receptacle is guilty of a felony. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03969-01-5